Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-307
Nebraska State Capitol Environs Commission; decision or action; appeal.

Any decision or action of the Nebraska State Capitol Environs Commission may be appealed to the city council of the city of Lincoln by filing an appeal with the city clerk within thirty days of the date of the commission's action, except that governmental units may opt to appeal actions of the commission to the Department of Administrative Services by so indicating at the time of filing the appeal with the city clerk.

Laws 1993, LB 271, § 4.